Hawaii statutes.
§142-62 Breaking, etc., of fence; penalty.
If any person maliciously and designedly opens a gateway, or breaks a fence, so
as to allow any animal ingress or egress, so that it may commit a trespass, or
maliciously and designedly drives or leads any animal into another locality
where it may commit a trespass, the person shall, for every offense, be fined
not more than $100, or imprisoned not more than one year. [L 1907, c 125, §11;
RL 1925, §699; RL 1935, §277; RL 1945, §1083; RL 1955, §20-61; HRS §142-62; gen
ch 1985]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next